District of Columbia statutes.
5-741

Payment and deposit of moneys.

Commencing with July 1, 1935, and thereafter, all moneys on June 14, 1935, required to be deposited to the credit of the Policemen and Firemen’s Relief Fund, District of Columbia, under § 5-706(a), shall be paid to the Collector of Taxes of the District of Columbia and deposited in the Treasury to the credit of the revenues of said District, except that all moneys required to be deposited with respect to officers and members of the Metropolitan Police force or the Fire Department of the District of Columbia shall be paid to the Custodian of Retirement Funds (as defined in § 1-702(6)) for deposit in the District of Columbia Police Officers and Fire Fighters’ Retirement Fund established by § 1-712.

June 14, 1935, 49 Stat. 358, ch. 241, § 1
Nov. 17, 1979, 93 Stat. 866, Pub. L. 96-122, § 122(b)(2)
District of Columbia police officers and firefighters retirement fund, see § 1-712.
Merit system, application to police officers and firefighters, see § 1-632.03.
Retirement fund for police officers and fire fighters, see § 1-903.01.
This section is referenced in § 1-712 and § 1-903.01.
1981 Ed., § 4-601.
1973 Ed., § 4-502.